Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle A. Supervision and Examination.

§ 81-27-7.001.
Commissioner shall have supervision over authorized trust institutions and shall examine.

For the purposes of this article, the term “authorized trust institution” means any state trust company, trust office or representative trust office.

Every authorized trust institution shall be under the supervision of the commissioner. The commissioner shall execute and enforce through the department and such other agents as are now or may hereafter be created or appointed, all laws which are now or may hereafter be enacted relating to authorized trust institutions. For the more complete and thorough enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may promulgate such rules or regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of the chapter, as may, in its opinion, be necessary to carry out the provisions of the laws relating to authorized trust institutions and as may be further necessary to insure safe and conservative management of an authorized trust institution under its supervision taking into consideration the appropriate interest of the creditors, stockholders, participants and the public in their relations with such authorized trust institutions. All authorized trust institutions doing business under the provisions of this chapter shall conduct their business in a manner consistent with all laws relating to authorized trust institutions, and all rules, regulations, and instructions that may be promulgated or issued by the commissioner.

The commissioner, or his duly authorized representative, for the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter and for the purpose of determining whether companies or offices are subject to the provisions of this article, may examine authorized trust institutions that have a charter, license or registration under this chapter and companies or offices that are reasonably suspected by the commissioner of conducting business that requires a charter, license or registration under this chapter, including all relevant books, records and papers employed by those companies or offices in the transaction of their business, and may summon witnesses and examine them under oath concerning matters relating to the business of those companies or offices, or such other matters as may be relevant to the discovery of violations of this chapter, including without limitation the conduct of business without a charter, license or registration as required under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2007.).

§ 81-27-7.002.
Fees for examination.

The fees for examination of authorized trust institutions shall be assessed and collected by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-7.003.
Department to act under authority of the commissioner.

All the powers, duties and functions granted to or imposed upon the department under this chapter shall be exercised under the direction and supervision of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.